Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-514.05
Health care providers; provider agencies; adopt procedures.

Provider agencies shall adopt written procedures regarding infectious diseases or conditions which address preexposure safeguards and postexposure risk-reduction methods. All records regarding any tests made as a result of a significant exposure of a health care provider to blood or other body fluid shall be kept only for the purpose of medical surveillance of an occupational risk of the health care provider.

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 11.